Washington statutes.
RCW 43.150.030

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Volunteer" means a person who is willing to work without expectation of salary or financial reward and who chooses where he or she provides services and the type of services he or she provides.

(2) "Center" means the state center for volunteerism and citizen service.

[ 1995 c 269 s 2301; 1992 c 66 s 3; 1982 1st ex.s. c 11 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Part headings not law—Severability—1995 c 269: See notes following RCW 18.16.050.